Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1831
Authority; make loans; issue bonds; conditions.

The authority may make loans to an elementary or secondary school and refund or reimburse outstanding obligations, mortgages, or advances, including advances from an endowment or any similar fund, issued, made, or given by such elementary or secondary school whether before, on, or after September 13, 1997, for the cost of a project, including the power to issue bonds and make loans to an elementary or secondary school to refinance indebtedness incurred or to reimburse advances made for projects undertaken prior thereto whenever the authority finds that such financing is in the public interest, and either: (1) Alleviates a financial hardship upon the elementary or secondary school, (2) results in a lesser cost of education, or (3) enables the elementary or secondary school to offer greater security for a loan or loans to finance a new project or projects or to effect savings in interest costs or more favorable amortization terms.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 31.